Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201579-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-2301 to 79-2308 shall be known and may be cited as the Diploma of High School Equivalency Assistance Act.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB382, § 1.
August 30, 2015